Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3226.03
River-flow enhancement bonds; board issuing bonds; powers; terms and conditions.

The board of a district issuing bonds pursuant to section 2-3226.01 may agree to pay fees to fiscal agents in connection with the placement of bonds of the district. Such bonds shall be subject to the same terms and conditions as provided by section 2-3254.07 for improvement project area bonds and such other terms and conditions as the board determines appropriate.

Laws 2007, LB701, § 8.